data/grammar/fst/suffixes-generated.lexc
LEXICON NnSuffixesGenerated
++aluk+1nn:aluk # ;
++aluk+1nn:aluk NounContinuations ;
++aluk+1nn:aaluk # ;
++aluk+1nn:aaluk NounContinuations ;
++aluk+1nn:SUPPRaluk # ;
++aluk+1nn:SUPPRaluk NounContinuations ;
++aluk+1nn:ialuk # ;
++aluk+1nn:ialuk NounContinuations ;
++aluk+1nn:SUPPRaaluk # ;
++aluk+1nn:SUPPRaaluk NounContinuations ;
++annuk+1nn:annuk # ;
++annuk+1nn:annuk NounContinuations ;
++annuk+1nn:SUPPRannuk # ;
++annuk+1nn:SUPPRannuk NounContinuations ;
++apik+1nn:apik # ;
++apik+1nn:apik NounContinuations ;
++apik+1nn:SUPPRapik # ;
++apik+1nn:SUPPRapik NounContinuations ;
++arjuk+1nn:arjuk # ;
++arjuk+1nn:arjuk NounContinuations ;
++arjuk+1nn:SUPPRarjuk # ;
++arjuk+1nn:SUPPRarjuk NounContinuations ;
++giik+1nn:giik # ;
++giik+1nn:giik NounContinuations ;
++giik+1nn:igiik # ;
++giik+1nn:igiik NounContinuations ;
++giik+1nn:SUPPRgiik # ;
++giik+1nn:SUPPRgiik NounContinuations ;
++giik+1nn:SUPPRriik # ;
++giik+1nn:SUPPRriik NounContinuations ;
++gulu+1nn:gulu # ;
++gulu+1nn:gulu NounContinuations ;
++gulu+1nn:SUPPRgulu # ;
++gulu+1nn:SUPPRgulu NounContinuations ;
++ilitaq+1nn:SUPPRilitaq # ;
++ilitaq+1nn:SUPPRilitaq NounContinuations ;
++ilitaq+1nn:ilitaq # ;
++ilitaq+1nn:ilitaq NounContinuations ;
++innaq+1nn:innaq # ;
++innaq+1nn:innaq NounContinuations ;
++innaq+1nn:SUPPRinnaq # ;
++innaq+1nn:SUPPRinnaq NounContinuations ;
++irujjaq+1nn:irujjaq # ;
++irujjaq+1nn:irujjaq NounContinuations ;
++irujjaq+1nn:SUPPRirujjaq # ;
++irujjaq+1nn:SUPPRirujjaq NounContinuations ;
++juaq+1nn:VOICEjuaq # ;
++juaq+1nn:VOICEjuaq NounContinuations ;
++kasaak+1nn:kasaak # ;
++kasaak+1nn:kasaak NounContinuations ;
++kasaak+1nn:SUPPRkasaak # ;
++kasaak+1nn:SUPPRkasaak NounContinuations ;
++kkanniq+1nn:kkanniq # ;
++kkanniq+1nn:kkanniq NounContinuations ;
++kkanniq+1nn:kanniq # ;
++kkanniq+1nn:kanniq NounContinuations ;
++kkanniq+1nn:SUPPRkkanniq # ;
++kkanniq+1nn:SUPPRkkanniq NounContinuations ;
++kkanniq+1nn:SUPPRkanniq # ;
++kkanniq+1nn:SUPPRkanniq NounContinuations ;
++kkiq+1nn:kkiq # ;
++kkiq+1nn:kkiq NounContinuations ;
++kkiq+1nn:SUPPRkkiq # ;
++kkiq+1nn:SUPPRkkiq NounContinuations ;
++kkut+1nn:kkut # ;
++kkut+1nn:kkut NounContinuations ;
++kkut+1nn:SUPPRkkut # ;
++kkut+1nn:SUPPRkkut NounContinuations ;
++ksaq+1nn:ksaq # ;
++ksaq+1nn:ksaq NounContinuations ;
++ksaq+1nn:ksaq AfterPlTRoot ;
++ksaq+1nn:SUPPRksaq # ;
++ksaq+1nn:SUPPRksaq NounContinuations ;
++ksaq+1nn:SUPPRksaq AfterPlTRoot ;
++kulu+1nn:kulu # ;
++kulu+1nn:kulu NounContinuations ;
++kulu+1nn:kuluk # ;
++kulu+1nn:kuluk NounContinuations ;
++kulu+1nn:SUPPRkulu # ;
++kulu+1nn:SUPPRkulu NounContinuations ;
++kulu+1nn:SUPPRkuluk # ;
++kulu+1nn:SUPPRkuluk NounContinuations ;
++kutaaq+1nn:kutaaq # ;
++kutaaq+1nn:kutaaq NounContinuations ;
++kutaaq+1nn:SUPPRkutaaq # ;
++kutaaq+1nn:SUPPRkutaaq NounContinuations ;
++kuvik+1nn:kuvik # ;
++kuvik+1nn:kuvik NounContinuations ;
++kuvik+1nn:SUPPRkuvik # ;
++kuvik+1nn:SUPPRkuvik NounContinuations ;
++laaq+1nn:laaq # ;
++laaq+1nn:laaq NounContinuations ;
++laaq+1nn:SUPPRlaaq # ;
++laaq+1nn:SUPPRlaaq NounContinuations ;
++lataaq+1nn:lataaq # ;
++lataaq+1nn:lataaq NounContinuations ;
++lataaq+1nn:SUPPRlataaq # ;
++lataaq+1nn:SUPPRlataaq NounContinuations ;
++liaq+1nn:liaq # ;
++liaq+1nn:liaq NounContinuations ;
++liaq+1nn:SUPPRliaq # ;
++liaq+1nn:SUPPRliaq NounContinuations ;
++lik+1nn:lik # ;
++lik+1nn:lik NounContinuations ;
++lik+1nn:SUPPRlik # ;
++lik+1nn:SUPPRlik NounContinuations ;
++limaaq+1nn:limaaq # ;
++limaaq+1nn:limaaq NounContinuations ;
++limaaq+1nn:SUPPRlimaaq # ;
++limaaq+1nn:SUPPRlimaaq NounContinuations ;
++lisaq+1nn:lisaq # ;
++lisaq+1nn:lisaq NounContinuations ;
++lisaq+1nn:SUPPRlisaq # ;
++lisaq+1nn:SUPPRlisaq NounContinuations ;
++llarik+2nn:llarik # ;
++llarik+2nn:llarik NounContinuations ;
++llarik+2nn:larik # ;
++llarik+2nn:larik NounContinuations ;
++llarik+2nn:SUPPRllarik # ;
++llarik+2nn:SUPPRllarik NounContinuations ;
++llarik+2nn:SUPPRlarik # ;
++llarik+2nn:SUPPRlarik NounContinuations ;
++luaq+2nn:luaq # ;
++luaq+2nn:luaq NounContinuations ;
++luaq+2nn:SUPPRluaq # ;
++luaq+2nn:SUPPRluaq NounContinuations ;
++luk+2nn:luk # ;
++luk+2nn:luk NounContinuations ;
++luk+2nn:SUPPRluk # ;
++luk+2nn:SUPPRluk NounContinuations ;
++luktaaq+1nn:luktaaq # ;
++luktaaq+1nn:luktaaq NounContinuations ;
++luktaaq+1nn:SUPPRluktaaq # ;
++luktaaq+1nn:SUPPRluktaaq NounContinuations ;
++luktaat+1nn:luktaat # ;
++luktaat+1nn:luktaat NounContinuations ;
++luktaat+1nn:SUPPRluktaat # ;
++luktaat+1nn:SUPPRluktaat NounContinuations ;
++miniq+1nn:miniq # ;
++miniq+1nn:miniq NounContinuations ;
++miniq+1nn:SUPPRminiq # ;
++miniq+1nn:SUPPRminiq NounContinuations ;
++miuq+1nn:miuq # ;
++miuq+1nn:miuq NounContinuations ;
++miuq+1nn:NASALmiuq # ;
++miuq+1nn:NASALmiuq NounContinuations ;
++miutaq+1nn:miutaq # ;
++miutaq+1nn:miutaq NounContinuations ;
++miutaq+1nn:miut # ;
++miutaq+1nn:miut NounContinuations ;
++miutaq+1nn:imiut # ;
++miutaq+1nn:imiut NounContinuations ;
++miutaq+1nn:NASALmiutaq # ;
++miutaq+1nn:NASALmiutaq NounContinuations ;
++miutaq+1nn:NASALmiut # ;
++miutaq+1nn:NASALmiut NounContinuations ;
++mmarik+1nn:mmarik # ;
++mmarik+1nn:mmarik NounContinuations ;
++mmarik+1nn:SUPPRmmarik # ;
++mmarik+1nn:SUPPRmmarik NounContinuations ;
++ngaaq+3nn:ngaaq # ;
++ngaaq+3nn:ngaaq NounContinuations ;
++ngaaq+3nn:NASALngaaq # ;
++ngaaq+3nn:NASALngaaq NounContinuations ;
++nitaq+1nn:nitaq # ;
++nitaq+1nn:nitaq NounContinuations ;
++nitaq+1nn:SUPPRnitaq # ;
++nitaq+1nn:SUPPRnitaq NounContinuations ;
++nnajuk+1nn:nnajuk # ;
++nnajuk+1nn:nnajuk NounContinuations ;
++nnajuk+1nn:SUPPRnnajuk # ;
++nnajuk+1nn:SUPPRnnajuk NounContinuations ;
++nngiq+1nn:nngiq # ;
++nngiq+1nn:nngiq NounContinuations ;
++nngiq+1nn:SUPPRnngiq # ;
++nngiq+1nn:SUPPRnngiq NounContinuations ;
++nnguaq+1nn:nnguaq # ;
++nnguaq+1nn:nnguaq NounContinuations ;
++nnguaq+1nn:SUPPRnnguaq # ;
++nnguaq+1nn:SUPPRnnguaq NounContinuations ;
++paaq+1nn:paaq # ;
++paaq+1nn:paaq NounContinuations ;
++patsiuk+1nn:patsiuk # ;
++patsiuk+1nn:patsiuk NounContinuations ;
++qajaa+1nn:qajaa # ;
++qajaa+1nn:qajaa NounContinuations ;
++qajaa+1nn:SUPPRqajaa # ;
++qajaa+1nn:SUPPRqajaa NounContinuations ;
++qallaq+1nn:qallaq # ;
++qallaq+1nn:qallaq NounContinuations ;
++qallaq+1nn:SUPPRqallaq # ;
++qallaq+1nn:SUPPRqallaq NounContinuations ;
++qammaq+1nn:qammaq # ;
++qammaq+1nn:qammaq NounContinuations ;
++qammaq+1nn:SUPPRqammaq # ;
++qammaq+1nn:SUPPRqammaq NounContinuations ;
++qarvik+1nn:qarvik # ;
++qarvik+1nn:qarvik NounContinuations ;
++qarvik+1nn:SUPPRqarvik # ;
++qarvik+1nn:SUPPRqarvik NounContinuations ;
++qati+1nn:qati # ;
++qati+1nn:qati NounContinuations ;
++qati+1nn:rqati # ;
++qati+1nn:rqati NounContinuations ;
++qati+1nn:SUPPRqati # ;
++qati+1nn:SUPPRqati NounContinuations ;
++qati+1nn:SUPPRrqati # ;
++qati+1nn:SUPPRrqati NounContinuations ;
++qauti+1nn:qauti # ;
++qauti+1nn:qauti NounContinuations ;
++qauti+1nn:SUPPRqauti # ;
++qauti+1nn:SUPPRqauti NounContinuations ;
++quti+1nn:quti # ;
++quti+1nn:quti NounContinuations ;
++quti+1nn:SUPPRquti # ;
++quti+1nn:SUPPRquti NounContinuations ;
++ralaaq+1nn:ralaaq # ;
++ralaaq+1nn:ralaaq NounContinuations ;
++ralaaq+1nn:SUPPRralaaq # ;
++ralaaq+1nn:SUPPRralaaq NounContinuations ;
++rujuq+2nn:rujuq # ;
++rujuq+2nn:rujuq NounContinuations ;
++rujuq+2nn:SUPPRrujuq # ;
++rujuq+2nn:SUPPRrujuq NounContinuations ;
++rulu+1nn:rulu # ;
++rulu+1nn:rulu NounContinuations ;
++rulu+1nn:ruluk # ;
++rulu+1nn:ruluk NounContinuations ;
++rulu+1nn:SUPPRrulu # ;
++rulu+1nn:SUPPRrulu NounContinuations ;
++rulu+1nn:SUPPRruluk # ;
++rulu+1nn:SUPPRruluk NounContinuations ;
++rusiq+2nn:rusiq # ;
++rusiq+2nn:rusiq NounContinuations ;
++rusiq+2nn:SUPPRrusiq # ;
++rusiq+2nn:SUPPRrusiq NounContinuations ;
++siaq+1nn:siaq # ;
++siaq+1nn:siaq NounContinuations ;
++siut+1nn:siut # ;
++siut+1nn:siut NounContinuations ;
++siut+1nn:isiut # ;
++siut+1nn:isiut NounContinuations ;
++sungnik+2nn:sungnik # ;
++sungnik+2nn:sungnik NounContinuations ;
++suuq+2nn:suuq # ;
++suuq+2nn:suuq NounContinuations ;
++suuq+2nn:SUPPRsuuq # ;
++suuq+2nn:SUPPRsuuq NounContinuations ;
++taaq+2nn:taaq # ;
++taaq+2nn:taaq NounContinuations ;
++taaq+2nn:KGUARDtaaq # ;
++taaq+2nn:KGUARDtaaq NounContinuations ;
++taasaaq+1nn:taasaaq # ;
++taasaaq+1nn:taasaaq NounContinuations ;
++taasaaq+1nn:KGUARDtaasaaq # ;
++taasaaq+1nn:KGUARDtaasaaq NounContinuations ;
++talik+1nn:talik # ;
++talik+1nn:talik NounContinuations ;
++talik+1nn:KGUARDtalik # ;
++talik+1nn:KGUARDtalik NounContinuations ;
++talik+1nn:SUPPRtalik # ;
++talik+1nn:SUPPRtalik NounContinuations ;
++tamaaq+1nn:tamaaq # ;
++tamaaq+1nn:tamaaq NounContinuations ;
++tamaaq+1nn:KGUARDtamaaq # ;
++tamaaq+1nn:KGUARDtamaaq NounContinuations ;
++tannaq+1nn:tannaq # ;
++tannaq+1nn:tannaq NounContinuations ;
++tannaq+1nn:KGUARDtannaq # ;
++tannaq+1nn:KGUARDtannaq NounContinuations ;
++tannaq+1nn:SUPPRtannaq # ;
++tannaq+1nn:SUPPRtannaq NounContinuations ;
++tsiaq+2nn:tsiaq # ;
++tsiaq+2nn:tsiaq NounContinuations ;
++tsiaq+2nn:KGUARDtsiaq # ;
++tsiaq+2nn:KGUARDtsiaq NounContinuations ;
++tsiaq+2nn:SUPPRtsiaq # ;
++tsiaq+2nn:SUPPRtsiaq NounContinuations ;
++tsiavak+1nn:tsiavak # ;
++tsiavak+1nn:tsiavak NounContinuations ;
++tsiavak+1nn:KGUARDtsiavak # ;
++tsiavak+1nn:KGUARDtsiavak NounContinuations ;
++tsiavak+1nn:SUPPRtsiavak # ;
++tsiavak+1nn:SUPPRtsiavak NounContinuations ;
++tuaq+2nn:tuaq # ;
++tuaq+2nn:tuaq NounContinuations ;
++tuaq+2nn:KGUARDtuaq # ;
++tuaq+2nn:KGUARDtuaq NounContinuations ;
++tuaq+2nn:SUPPRtu # ;
++tuaq+2nn:SUPPRtu NounContinuations ;
++tuinnaq+2nn:tuinnaq # ;
++tuinnaq+2nn:tuinnaq NounContinuations ;
++tuinnaq+2nn:KGUARDtuinnaq # ;
++tuinnaq+2nn:KGUARDtuinnaq NounContinuations ;
++tuinnaq+2nn:SUPPRtuinnaq # ;
++tuinnaq+2nn:SUPPRtuinnaq NounContinuations ;
++tukaq+1nn:tukaq # ;
++tukaq+1nn:tukaq NounContinuations ;
++tukaq+1nn:KGUARDtukaq # ;
++tukaq+1nn:KGUARDtukaq NounContinuations ;
++tukaq+1nn:itukaq # ;
++tukaq+1nn:itukaq NounContinuations ;
++tukaq+1nn:SUPPRtukaq # ;
++tukaq+1nn:SUPPRtukaq NounContinuations ;
++tuqaq+1nn:tuqaq # ;
++tuqaq+1nn:tuqaq NounContinuations ;
++tuqaq+1nn:KGUARDtuqaq # ;
++tuqaq+1nn:KGUARDtuqaq NounContinuations ;
++tuqaq+1nn:ituqaq # ;
++tuqaq+1nn:ituqaq NounContinuations ;
++tuqaq+1nn:SUPPRtuqaq # ;
++tuqaq+1nn:SUPPRtuqaq NounContinuations ;
++tuuq+1nn:tuuq # ;
++tuuq+1nn:tuuq NounContinuations ;
++tuuq+1nn:KGUARDtuuq # ;
++tuuq+1nn:KGUARDtuuq NounContinuations ;
++ut+2nn:ut # ;
++ut+2nn:ut NounContinuations ;
++ut+2nn:uti # ;
++ut+2nn:uti NounContinuations ;
++ut+2nn:SUPPRut # ;
++ut+2nn:SUPPRut NounContinuations ;
++ut+2nn:SUPPRuti # ;
++ut+2nn:SUPPRuti NounContinuations ;
++vik+1nn:vik # ;
++vik+1nn:vik NounContinuations ;
++vik+1nn:SUPPRvik # ;
++vik+1nn:SUPPRvik NounContinuations ;
++viniq+1nn:viniq # ;
++viniq+1nn:viniq NounContinuations ;
++viniq+1nn:SUPPRviniq # ;
++viniq+1nn:SUPPRviniq NounContinuations ;

LEXICON NnSuffixesGeneratedSpeculative
++galaq+1nn:galaq OnlyNumberPNounEndings ;
++galaq+1nn:SUPPRgalaq OnlyNumberPNounEndings ;
++rujuq+1nn:rujuq OnlyNumberPNounEndings ;
++rujuq+1nn:SUPPRrujuq OnlyNumberPNounEndings ;
